waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX E Y 165
SFX E a       u               a
SFX E a       i               [^i]a
SFX E a       0               [^čž]ia
SFX E čia     ti              čia
SFX E žia     i               džia
SFX E 0       me              a
SFX E 0       m               a
SFX E 0       te              a
SFX E 0       t               a
SFX E 0       u               [^dt]i
SFX E i       žiu             di
SFX E ti      čiu             ti
SFX E 0       me              [aio]
SFX E 0       m               [aio]
SFX E 0       te              [aio]
SFX E 0       t               [aio]
SFX E o       au              o
SFX E o       ai              o
SFX E 0       me              o
SFX E 0       m               o
SFX E 0       te              o
SFX E 0       t               o
SFX E 0       nt              [ai]
SFX E o       ant             o
SFX E 0       ntis            [ai]
SFX E a       ąs              a
SFX E i       įs              i
SFX E 0       nčio            [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiam           [ai]
SFX E 0       ntį             [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiu            [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiame          [ai]
SFX E o       antis           o
SFX E o       ąs              o
SFX E o       ančio           o
SFX E o       ančiam          o
SFX E o       antį            o
SFX E o       ančiu           o
SFX E o       ančiame         o
SFX E 0       nti             [ai]
SFX E 0       nčios           [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiai           [ai]
SFX E 0       nčią            [ai]
SFX E 0       nčia            [ai]
SFX E 0       nčioje          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčioj           [ai]
SFX E o       anti            o
SFX E o       ančios          o
SFX E o       ančiai          o
SFX E o       ančią           o
SFX E o       ančia           o
SFX E o       ančioje         o
SFX E o       ančioj          o
SFX E 0       ntys            [ai]
SFX E a       ą               a
SFX E i       į               i
SFX E 0       nčių            [ai]
SFX E 0       ntiems          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčius           [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiais          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiuose         [ai]
SFX E o       antys           o
SFX E o       ą               o
SFX E o       ančių           o
SFX E o       antiems         o
SFX E o       ančius          o
SFX E o       ančiais         o
SFX E o       ančiuose        o
SFX E 0       nčioms          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčias           [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiomis         [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiose          [ai]
SFX E o       ančioms         o
SFX E o       ančias          o
SFX E o       ančiomis        o
SFX E o       ančiose         o
SFX E 0       ntysis          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiojo          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiajam         [ai]
SFX E 0       ntįjį           [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiuoju         [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiajame        [ai]
SFX E o       antysis         o
SFX E o       ančiojo         o
SFX E o       ančiajam        o
SFX E o       antįjį          o
SFX E o       ančiuoju        o
SFX E o       ančiajame       o
SFX E 0       nčioji          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiosios        [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiajai         [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiąją          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiąja          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiojoje        [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiojoj         [ai]
SFX E o       ančioji         o
SFX E o       ančiosios       o
SFX E o       ančiajai        o
SFX E o       ančiąją         o
SFX E o       ančiąja         o
SFX E o       ančiojoje       o
SFX E o       ančiojoj        o
SFX E 0       ntieji          [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiųjų          [ai]
SFX E 0       ntiesiems       [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiuosius       [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiaisiais      [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiuosiuose     [ai]
SFX E o       antieji         o
SFX E o       ančiųjų         o
SFX E o       antiesiems      o
SFX E o       ančiuosius      o
SFX E o       ančiaisiais     o
SFX E o       ančiuosiuose    o
SFX E 0       nčiosioms       [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiąsias        [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiosiomis      [ai]
SFX E 0       nčiosiose       [ai]
SFX E o       ančiosioms      o
SFX E o       ančiąsias       o
SFX E o       ančiosiomis     o
SFX E o       ančiosiose      o
SFX E 0       mas             [aio]
SFX E 0       mo              [aio]
SFX E 0       mam             [aio]
SFX E 0       mą              [aio]
SFX E 0       mu              [aio]
SFX E 0       mame            [aio]
SFX E 0       ma              [aio]
SFX E 0       mos             [aio]
SFX E 0       mai             [aio]
SFX E 0       moje            [aio]
SFX E 0       moj             [aio]
SFX E 0       mi              [aio]
SFX E 0       mų              [aio]
SFX E 0       miems           [aio]
SFX E 0       mus             [aio]
SFX E 0       mais            [aio]
SFX E 0       muose           [aio]
SFX E 0       moms            [aio]
SFX E 0       momis           [aio]
SFX E 0       mose            [aio]
SFX E 0       masis           [aio]
SFX E 0       mojo            [aio]
SFX E 0       majam           [aio]
SFX E 0       mąjį            [aio]
SFX E 0       muoju           [aio]
SFX E 0       majame          [aio]
SFX E 0       moji            [aio]
SFX E 0       mosios          [aio]
SFX E 0       majai           [aio]
SFX E 0       mąją            [aio]
SFX E 0       mąja            [aio]
SFX E 0       mojoje          [aio]
SFX E 0       mojoj           [aio]
SFX E 0       mieji           [aio]
SFX E 0       mųjų            [aio]
SFX E 0       miesiems        [aio]
SFX E 0       muosius         [aio]
SFX E 0       maisiais        [aio]
SFX E 0       muosiuose       [aio]
SFX E 0       mosioms         [aio]
SFX E 0       mąsias          [aio]
SFX E 0       mosiomis        [aio]
SFX E 0       mosiose         [aio]
