waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
agurkauja/ENRXdjv
aižėja/ENXek
akstina/ENXf
alioja/ENXd
amalgamuoja/ENX
angažuoja/ERSX
anuliuoja/ENX
apmaudija/ENX
apstėja/ENX
armazuoja/ENX
atkaiščiuoja/ENX
atsigėri/ENX
audrina/ENRXckow
ausdina/ENRXdp
ašaroja/ERSXadefijklmopqruvx
baikštėja/ENXd
balina/ENRXdefilr
bambsi/ENX
barkši/ENX
bauboja/ENXl
bendravardiklina/ENXk
besiblaivo/E
besididžiuoja/E
besigalynėja/E
besijuokia/E
besikumeliuoja/E
besinėšina/E
besiruošinėja/E
besisvečiuoja/E
besičiaupo/E
bidzena/ENXdg
birbia/ENXdefgijkl
bizija/ENX
blendžia/ERSXcfjkl
blizgina/ENRXdefpqr
blunka/ENXacdef
blįsta/ENXdjk
braizgėja/ENX
brauko/ENRXadefjkqr
brinksta/ENXadefhijkl
bruzda/ENXdk
brūzdžia/ENX
bugdo/ENXdgjkl
burbso/ENX
buvoja/ENXf
būbsi/ENX
campinėja/ENX
cibnoja/ENX
cirpia/ENXk
cyptelėja/ENX
dainuoja/ERSXabcdefghijkloqruvwx
darganoja/ENX
daužia/ERSXcdefhiklpqrwx
dedina/ENX
deklaruoja/ENX
dempinguoja/ENX
detektuoja/ENX
didėja/ENXf
dilga/ENX
dirba/ERSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
diržėja/ENXk
domina/ENXfk
draiskaliuoja/ENX
dreifuoja/ENX
dribsnoja/ENX
driumba/ENX
drungina/ENX
dryska/ENXabcdefikouvwx
drūsta/ENX
dulkina/ERSXacdefjklmpqrtvw
dunduliuoja/ENXk
dursto/ENXdfk
dvesia/ENXadefhjl
dvozgia/ENX
dykinėja/ENRXdfijqv
dzingtelėja/ENX
dėlioja/ERSXabcdefhijklnptuvw
dūlina/ENXbde
dūzgia/ENXabdefghiklopqrstuvwx
džiūsta/ENXacdefhijklprtw
ekspedijuoja/ENX
erdėja/ENXdik
fanatizuoja/ERSXk
formatuoja/ENXhk
gaguoja/ENX
gaišta/ENXdefikl
gangrenuoja/ENX
gargaliuoja/ENXfjk
gaubsto/ENRXl
geibsta/ENXae
geltonija/ENXef
gerklėja/ENX
giliauja/ENX
girga/ENX
girtauja/ENXi
glaudėja/ENX
glitena/ERSX
glumsta/ENXak
gnaibioja/ERSX
gobsto/ENRXa
grabštauja/ENX
grasina/ENRXbcefjl
greitėja/ENXf
gribštelėja/ENX
griozdžia/ENXdl
grožėja/ENRXfr
gruntuoja/ENX
grėbinėja/ENX
grūzda/ENXafk
gumba/ENXcd
guodžia/ERSXefprv
gurna/ENXe
gydytojauja/ENX
gyžta/ENXacfk
gūrina/ENXd
hipnotizuoja/ENXlx
ilsi/EOSXfnprv
indikuoja/ENXfk
inscenizuoja/ENX
investuoja/ERSXhjktvw
išdantuoja/ENX
išplakdina/ENX
išsiteirauja/ENX
jaukina/ENRXejv
jonizuoja/ENX
juodija/ENXefl
kaba/ENXbdfv
kaimynauja/ENRX
kaivina/ENX
kaldina/ERSXdepq
kamanoja/ENRXefr
kandinėja/ENX
kapstinėja/ERSX
karksi/ENXdfjkv
kartėja/ENXf
kasuoja/ENX
kaulėja/ENXk
keblėja/ENX
kelnėja/ERSXeq
kepėstuoja/ENX
kervina/ENX
keverzinėja/ENX
kiaušiniauja/ENX
kilnina/ENX
kinknoja/ENXf
kirba/ENX
kirpinėja/ENX
kiurkia/ENX
kiūtoja/ESXd
klampina/ENXck
klebekščiuoja/ENX
kleizoja/ENX
klepsi/ENXk
klibikštuoja/ENX
klimštelėja/ENX
kliunktelėja/ENX
kloja/ERSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
klupdo/ENXfk
klypina/ENXd
knaboja/ENX
knarkso/ENX
kniaukia/ENXekl
knirkčioja/ENX
knoja/ERSXbn
koksuoja/ENX
kompostuoja/ENX
konkuruoja/ENXefv
konvojuoja/ENe
koruliuoja/ENX
kraipo/ERSXdfkpruv
krankčioja/ENX
kraulinėja/ENX
kreivina/ENRXdekpw
krenkščioja/ENX
krienauja/ENX
kriptelėja/ENX
kroplina/ENX
krykštelėja/ENX
krūmija/ERSXdp
kuka/ENX
kultivuoja/ENX
kunkuliuoja/ENXkl
kurkia/ENXfjkl
kutena/ERSXabdfijklmrvx
kvaitinėja/ENX
kvanklinėja/ENX
kverkia/ENX
kvykauja/ENX
kvėšta/ENX
kyšuoja/ENX
kęra/ENX
kūprinėja/ENX
laimi/ENXi
lakatuoja/ENX
landina/ENXcdfkl
lasinėja/ENX
laviruoja/ENX
legalizuoja/ERSX
lengvėja/ENXf
lesina/ENRXbdfjklp
liejo/EOPSXabcdefhijklmoprtvwx
likinėja/ENXbf
linksta/ENXbcdefhjkl
liudija/ENXf
liūliuoja/ENXdfkl
loštelėja/ENX
lydi/EOSXbcdefgilr
lyžčioja/ENXd
lūžta/ENXabcdefhijkl
maišo/ERSXcdfhijkloprtvwx
malina/ENRXco
manko/ENRXdk
martauja/ENX
matininkauja/ENX
mausčioja/ENX
meduoja/ENRXdkpw
melsvuoja/ENX
metinėja/ENXabdefhilmq
miestėja/ENXk
mikčioja/ENXfk
minuoja/ENXdl
mitrina/ENRXdp
mokina/ENX
mostiguoja/ENX
muktelėja/ENX
murma/ENXefik
mušnoja/ENX
mėgdžioja/ENRXf
mėžia/ENRXacdefjlmq
naikina/ERSXadefkrw
narplioja/ENRXbdjklpw
nebesa/E
nebesibylinėja/E
nebesidumšlėja/E
nebesigodi/E
nebesikebernoja/E
nebesikėsina/E
nebesipliuškina/E
nebesislėgėja/E
nebesivadėja/E
nebesiūksto/E
nerimauja/ENX
nesibodi/E
nesidievažija/E
nesigentina/E
nesikaprizija/E
nesikuproja/E
nesiparšiuoja/E
nesisieloja/E
nesiteirauja/E
nesiėriuoja/E
nešioja/ERSXacdefhijklmnpqruvwx
nirtina/ENXl
niursta/ENXfk
nokina/ENRXadefjkpv
nuimdina/ENX
nuomoja/ERSXdhp
nusišaipo/ENX
nyžta/ENXefl
ornamentuoja/ENX
padegėliauja/ENX
paikioja/ENX
pakalėja/ENX
pakvailsta/ENX
pamezgi/ENX
panauja/ENX
papynėja/ENX
parpuoja/ENX
pasidomi/ENX
pasimėgauja/ENX
pasišaipo/ENX
pastalgsta/ENX
patranka/ENX
paveiksluoja/ERSX
pašina/ERSXfr
pelenguoja/ENX
peri/ENOXdjlv
peša/ERSXacdefjklmopqruvwx
pijoja/ENX
pila/ERSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
pina/ERSXacdefhjklopqrtvw
piršliauja/ENX
plastena/ENXk
pleišija/ENXl
plerpso/ENX
pliaukščioja/ENX
plinta/ENXdf
pliupsi/ENX
pliūrija/ENX
plumptelėja/ENX
plyšauja/ENX
plūkauja/ENX
porina/ENX
prasikalsta/ENX
priešpiečiauja/ENX
prognozuoja/ENXd
puldinėja/ENXlx
purptelėja/ENX
pykina/ENXckl
pūgoja/ENX
ragina/ERSXabcdfgijklrv
rakina/ERSXbjklnvwx
raugia/ERSXafjklmvx
raštuoja/ENXd
rembėja/ENXck
revoliucina/ENX
rikošetuoja/ENX
riūkia/ENX
rusena/ENX
rėkia/ENRXadefhiklpx
rūstina/ENRXklwx
samanoja/ENXa
savarankėja/ENX
seniūnauja/ENX
siektelėja/ENX
siurbtelėja/ENX
skalbinėja/ENX
skaudena/ENX
skilčiuoja/ENXk
skrabina/ENX
skundžia/ERSXacfjkmpqrv
slampina/ENX
sloguoja/ENXk
smalsta/ENX
smirsta/ENXcfijkl
snigtelėja/ENX
spartina/ERSXfkr
spiria/ERSXbcdefhjklnopqrwx
springsta/ENRXfjklv
spįstelėja/ENX
stabčioja/ENX
stena/ENXdk
stoviniuoja/ENXf
stryktelėja/ENX
styrina/ENX
sugestijuoja/ENX
sunkina/ERSXafmrv
susilažina/ENX
suūžta/ENX
svetina/ERSX
sąvadauja/ENX
taisinėja/ERSXhl
tamsėja/ENXdefk
tarška/ENXdk
tebesiatrofuoja/E
tebesielgia/E
tebesikepurnėja/E
tebesipūškina/E
tebesivaikuoja/E
telefikuoja/ENX
terorizuoja/ENX
tesidienija/E
tesikabaroja/E
tesiožiuoja/E
tesitalksto/E
tešloja/ENX
tingi/EOSXfijpv
tirština/ENXefk
traliuoja/ENX
traškina/ENXk
triaukšnoja/ENX
tripčioja/ENX
tryni/ENXf
tulžta/ENXfkl
tušuoja/ENXel
tvinkčioja/ENX
tykštelėja/ENX
tūpia/ERSXaejklx
uostinėja/ENXadk
užkempa/ENX
vaginėja/ENXak
vakuoja/ENX
vanagoja/ENX
varpauja/ENX
vazoja/ERSX
velenuoja/ENX
verkšnoja/ENX
vibžda/ENX
vilgsta/ENXk
virbsta/ENXe
viršauja/ENX
vokiečiuoja/ENX
vyteliauja/ENX
vėto/ENXdj
zirzina/ENX
zykia/ENX
čiaukštelėja/ENX
čirška/ENXfk
čiurkši/ENX
čypia/ENX
įpusėja/ENX
šalstelėja/ENX
šefuoja/ENX
šipatauja/ENX
šiurpčioja/ENX
šleivina/ENX
šlitinėja/ENX
šlyvina/ENX
šmurkštelėja/ENX
šniaukia/ENX
šokteli/ENX
švarkščia/ERSX
švilptelėja/ENX
šąla/ENXabcdefhjkl
ūmauja/ENX
žaibuliuoja/ENX
žebrina/ENX
žiaumoja/ENX
žingsniuoja/ERSXabcdefghijkloqtv
žiurkso/ENX
žliurgsta/ENXk
žuvininkauja/ENX
žviluoja/ENX
žysta/ENXeik
